Utah statutes.
32A-1-120.   Judicial review -- Enforcement.
(1)  In a disciplinary proceeding, a respondent found in a final order of the
commission to have violated this title or rules of the commission made under
this title may seek judicial review in a court of competent jurisdiction
pursuant to the judicial review provisions of Sections 63G-4-401 through
63G-4-405.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection 63G-4-403(4)(g), an appellate court may not
grant relief on the basis that a finding of fact by the commission in a formal
disciplinary proceeding is not supported, if the commission's finding of fact
is supported by any evidence of substance in the record of the formal
disciplinary proceeding when viewed in light of the whole record before the
court.
(3)  In addition to another remedy provided by law, the commission may seek
enforcement of a commission order in a disciplinary proceeding by seeking
civil enforcement in a state district court in accordance with Section
63G-4-501.
